Illinois, session 104th, SB262.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Controlled Substances Act is 5amended by adding Section 416 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 570/416 new)7    Sec. 416. Tableting and encapsulating machines. 8    (a) In this Section:9    "Encapsulating machine" means manual, semiautomatic, or 10fully automatic equipment that can be used to fill shells or 11capsules with powdered or granular solids or semisolid 12material to produce coherent solid contents.13    "Tableting machine" means manual, semiautomatic, or fully 14automatic equipment that can be used to compact, compress, or 15mold powdered or granular solids or semisolid material to 16produce fused coherent solid tablets. 17    (b) It is unlawful for any person to possess, purchase, 18deliver, sell, or possess with intent to sell a tableting 19machine or encapsulating machine knowing, or under 20circumstances where one reasonably should know, that it will 21be used to manufacture, compound, convert, produce, process, 22prepare, or otherwise introduce into the human body a 23controlled substance in violation of this Act.  SB0262- 2 -LRB104 02949 RLC 12965 b1    (c) Any person who violates this Section is guilty of a 2Class 3 felony.